Hawaii statutes.
[§420D-11] Annual benefit report. (a)
A sustainable business corporation shall deliver to each shareholder an annual
benefit report including:

(1) A narrative description of:

(A) The ways in which the sustainable
business corporation pursued general public benefits during the year and the
extent to which general public benefit was created;

(B) The ways in which the sustainable
business corporation pursued any specific public benefit that the articles
state as a purpose of the sustainable business corporation and the extent to
which that specific public benefit was created; and

(C) Any circumstances that have hindered the
creation by the sustainable business corporation of general or specific public
benefits;

(2) An assessment of the overall social and
environmental performance of the sustainable business corporation, prepared in
accordance with a third-party standard under section 420D-12 applied
consistently with any application of that standard in prior benefit reports or
accompanied by an explanation of the reasons for any inconsistent application;

(3) The name of the benefit director and the benefit
officer, if any, and the address to which correspondence to each of them may be
directed;

(4) The compensation paid by the sustainable business
corporation during the year to each director in the person's capacity as
director;

(5) The name of each person who owns five per cent or
more of the outstanding shares of the sustainable business corporation either
beneficially to the extent known to the sustainable business corporation or of
record;

(6) The statement of the benefit director described
in section 420D-7(c);

(7) A statement of any connection to the organization
that developed the third-party standard under section 420D-12, or its directors,
officers, or material owners from the sustainable business corporation, or its
directors, officers, and material owners, including any financial or governance
relationship that might materially affect the credibility of the objective
assessment of the third-party standard; and

(8) A statement that, as a private corporation under
the direction of its board and accountable to its shareholders and the articles
and bylaws of the sustainable business corporation, including those governing
the general or specific public benefit purpose and the activities of the
sustainable business corporation, the sustainable business corporation and its
activities are subject to the oversight of the board of the sustainable
business corporation and are not subject to the direct oversight, regulation,
or endorsement of any governmental body.

(b) A sustainable business corporation shall
post a draft of its benefit report on the public section of its website, or
make it otherwise available to the public, for a sixty-day public comment
period prior to final publication of the benefit report. The deadline for a
commentary shall be published in a publicly accessible manner.

(c) The benefit report shall be sent annually
to each shareholder within one hundred twenty days following the end of the
fiscal year of the sustainable business corporation.

(d) A sustainable business corporation shall
post its most recent benefit report on the public portion of its website, if
any, except that the compensation paid to directors and any financial or
proprietary information included in the benefit report may be omitted from the
benefit report as posted. If a sustainable business corporation does not have
a public website, it shall deliver a copy of its most recent benefit report
upon request and without charge to any person who requests a copy. [L 2011, c
209, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next